Washington statutes.
RCW 18.380.070

License or certification—Renewal.

(1) The secretary shall establish by rule the requirements for renewal of a license or certification, but may not increase the licensure or certification requirements provided in this chapter. The secretary shall establish administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for license and certification periods and renewals as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(2) Failure to renew the license or certification invalidates the license or certification and all privileges granted by the license or certification. If a license or certification has lapsed for a period longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the secretary by completing continuing competency requirements or meeting other standards determined by the secretary.

[ 2015 c 118 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 118: See note following RCW 18.380.010.